Illinois, session 104th, HB4385.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Sections 3-609, 3-609.1, 3-609.3, 3-620, 3-623, and 63-806.2 and by adding Section 3-609.4 as follows: 7    (625 ILCS 5/3-609)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-609)8    Sec. 3-609. Plates for veterans with disabilities. 9    (a) Any veteran who holds proof of a service-connected 10disability from the United States Department of Veterans 11Affairs, and who has obtained certification from a licensed 12physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice 13registered nurse that the service-connected disability 14qualifies the veteran for issuance of registration plates or 15digital registration plates or decals to a person with 16disabilities in accordance with Section 3-616, may, without 17the payment of any registration fee, make application to the 18Secretary of State for up to 2 sets of license plates for 19veterans with disabilities displaying the international symbol 20of access, for the registration of a one motor vehicle of the 21first division, one motorcycle, or one motor vehicle of the 22second division weighing not more than 8,000 pounds.23    (b) Any veteran who holds proof of a service-connected   HB4385 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17295 LNS 30717 b1disability from the United States Department of Veterans 2Affairs, and whose degree of disability has been declared to 3be 50% or more, but whose disability does not qualify the 4veteran for a plate or decal for persons with disabilities 5under Section 3-616, may, without the payment of any 6registration fee, make application to the Secretary for up to 72 sets of a special registration plates plate or digital 8registration plates plate without the international symbol of 9access for the registration of a one motor vehicle of the first 10division, one motorcycle, or one motor vehicle of the second 11division weighing not more than 8,000 pounds.12    (c) Renewal of such registration must be accompanied with 13documentation for eligibility of registration without fee 14unless the applicant has a permanent qualifying disability, 15and such registration plates or digital registration plates 16may not be issued to any person not eligible therefor. The 17Illinois Department of Veterans Affairs may assist in 18providing the documentation of disability.19    (d) The design and color of the plates shall be within the 20discretion of the Secretary, except that the plates issued 21under subsection (b) of this Section shall not contain the 22international symbol of access. The Secretary may, in his or 23her discretion, allow the plates to be issued as vanity or 24personalized plates in accordance with Section 3-405.1 of this 25Code. Registration shall be for a multi-year period and may be 26issued staggered registration.   HB4385 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 17295 LNS 30717 b1    (e) Any person eligible to receive license plates under 2this Section who has been approved for benefits under the 3Senior Citizens and Persons with Disabilities Property Tax 4Relief Act, or who has claimed and received a grant under that 5Act, shall pay a fee of $24 instead of the fee otherwise 6provided in this Code for passenger cars displaying standard 7multi-year registration plates or digital registration plates 8issued under Section 3-414.1, for motor vehicles registered at 98,000 pounds or less under Section 3-815(a), or for 10recreational vehicles registered at 8,000 pounds or less under 11Section 3-815(b), for a second set of plates under this 12Section. 13    (f) With respect to the supporting documentation required 14to obtain a plate under this Section, the Secretary shall 15allow an applicant to redact information on the documentation 16that pertains to the nature of the applicant's health issue, 17unless that information is necessary to confirm that the 18applicant's disability is service-connected or to establish 19the degree of the applicant's service-connected disability. 20(Source: P.A. 104-234, eff. 8-15-25.) 21    (625 ILCS 5/3-609.1)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-609.1)22    Sec. 3-609.1. Medal of Honor plates. Any resident of the 23State of Illinois who has been awarded the Medal of Honor, or 24an Illinois resident who is the surviving spouse of a person 25who was awarded the Medal of Honor, may make application for   HB4385 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 17295 LNS 30717 b1the registration for up to 2 motor vehicles of a motor vehicle 2owned solely or in part by such recipient, to the Secretary of 3State without the payment of any registration fee. 4Registration shall be for a multi-year period effective from 5issuance. The Secretary of State shall furnish at his or her 6office at no cost to such Medal of Honor recipients, plates 7bearing up to 3 letters designating the recipient's initials 8followed by the letters M O H signifying the Medal of Honor. 9The plate shall be suitable for attachment to a motor vehicle 10or motorcycle registered under this Code.11(Source: P.A. 101-262, eff. 1-1-20.) 12    (625 ILCS 5/3-609.3)13    Sec. 3-609.3. Military series registration plates for 14veterans with disabilities. In lieu of receiving registration 15plates without the payment of a fee under Section 3-609, any 16veteran who holds proof of a 50% or greater service-connected 17disability from the United States Department of Veterans 18Affairs may apply for a military series registration plate in 19the manner prescribed by the Secretary of State. Upon the 20veteran showing proof of the disability, up to 2 sets of a 21military series registration plates plate may be issued to the 22veteran without fee for the registration of a one motor 23vehicle of the first division or one motor vehicle of the 24second division weighing not more than 8,000 pounds. Any 25additional fee collected for the issuance and renewal of the   HB4385 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 17295 LNS 30717 b1military series registration plate, as may be specified in the 2provision authorizing the issuance of that special plate, 3shall not be included in the fee waiver authorized under this 4Section. 5(Source: P.A. 104-230, eff. 1-1-26.) 6    (625 ILCS 5/3-609.4 new)7    Sec. 3-609.4. Second set of no-fee military plates. A 8person eligible to receive special plates under Section 3-609, 93-609.1, 3-609.3, 3-620, or 3-623 is entitled to receive, upon 10application to the Secretary of State, a second set of the 11special plates under the same terms and conditions as the 12first set of special plates. 13    (625 ILCS 5/3-620)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-620)14    Sec. 3-620. The Secretary, upon receipt of an application 15made on the form prescribed by the Secretary of State, may 16issue special registration plates to United States citizens, 17who are present or former members of the United States armed 18forces or any of its allies, and who were prisoners of war of 19World War I, World War II, the Korean Conflict, and the 20Vietnamese conflict, or to the widowed spouse of a former 21member of the United States armed forces, providing that 22widowed spouse was married to the POW at the time of death, and 23is a single person at the time of application. The special 24plates issued pursuant to this Section shall be affixed only   HB4385 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 17295 LNS 30717 b1to passenger vehicles of the first division subject to the 2staggered registration system, motorcycles, and vehicles of 3the second division having a gross weight of 8,000 pounds or 4less and shall be issued without charge. Only 2 sets one set of 5plates may be issued at no fee.6    The design and color of the prisoner of war plates shall be 7wholly within the discretion of the Secretary of State. The 8Secretary may, in his or her discretion, allow the plates to be 9issued as vanity or personalized plates in accordance with 10Section 3-405.1 of this Code. 11(Source: P.A. 95-353, eff. 1-1-08.) 12    (625 ILCS 5/3-623)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-623)13    Sec. 3-623. Purple Heart Plates. 14    (a) The Secretary, upon receipt of an application made in 15the form prescribed by the Secretary of State, may issue to 16recipients awarded the Purple Heart by a branch of the armed 17forces of the United States who reside in Illinois, special 18registration plates. The Secretary, upon receipt of the proper 19application, may also issue these special registration plates 20to an Illinois resident who is the surviving spouse of a person 21who was awarded the Purple Heart by a branch of the armed 22forces of the United States. The special plates issued 23pursuant to this Section should be affixed only to passenger 24vehicles of the 1st division, including motorcycles, or motor 25vehicles of the 2nd division weighing not more than 8,000   HB4385 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 17295 LNS 30717 b1pounds. The Secretary may, in his or her discretion, allow the 2plates to be issued as vanity or personalized plates in 3accordance with Section 3-405.1 of this Code. The Secretary of 4State must make a version of the special registration plates 5authorized under this Section in a form appropriate for 6motorcycles. 7    (b) The design and color of such plates shall be wholly 8within the discretion of the Secretary of State. Appropriate 9documentation, as determined by the Secretary, and the 10appropriate registration fee shall accompany the application, 11except:12        (1) a person eligible to be issued Purple Heart plates 13    may display the plates on up to 2 vehicles one vehicle 14    without the payment of any registration or registration 15    renewal fee; and16        (2) for an individual who has been issued Purple Heart 17    plates for an additional vehicle and who has been approved 18    for benefits under the Senior Citizens and Persons with 19    Disabilities Property Tax Relief Act, the annual fee for 20    the registration of the vehicle shall be as provided in 21    Section 3-806.3 of this Code.22(Source: P.A. 98-902, eff. 1-1-15; 99-143, eff. 7-27-15.) 23    (625 ILCS 5/3-806.2)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-806.2)24    Sec. 3-806.2. Limitations on no-fee plates. Except as 25provided in Section 3-609.4, no No individual shall be issued   HB4385 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 17295 LNS 30717 b1more than one pair of plates of any category for which no fee 2is required. The Secretary of State may issue additional pairs 3of plates of any such category upon receiving the required 4application and registration fees.5(Source: P.A. 88-517.) 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 72027.